Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Application and Effect.

Sec. 44.62.010.
Application to State Organization Act of 1959.

Rule-making power conferred by ch 64 SLA 1959 is subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 2(4) art I (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

It is not possible to eliminate the reference to ch 64 SLA 1959 in the above section. The rule-making powers referred to are scattered throughout this revision.

Sec. 44.62.020.
Authority to adopt, administer, or enforce regulations.

Except for the authority conferred on the lieutenant governor in AS

44.62.130

—

44.62.170

, AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

do not confer authority on or augment the authority of a state agency to adopt, administer, or enforce a regulation. To be effective, each regulation adopted must be within the scope of authority conferred and in accordance with standards prescribed by other provisions of law.

History.

(§ 4 art I (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 11 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

” and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 44.62.030.
Consistency between regulation and statute.

If, by express or implied terms of a statute, a state agency has authority to adopt regulations to implement, interpret, make specific or otherwise carry out the provisions of the statute, a regulation adopted is not valid or effective unless consistent with the statute and reasonably necessary to carry out the purpose of the statute.

History.

(§ 5 art I (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)